tools/src/parsers/test/replace_test_37.xfst
set precision 1
set print-weight ON

regex a b -> x::1 || a b _ a ;
apply down abababa
echo --

regex a b -> x::1 \\ a b _ a ;
apply down abababa
echo --

regex a b -> x::1 // a b _ a ;
apply down abababa
echo --

regex a b -> x::1 \/ a b _ a ;
apply down abababa
echo --

regex a b (->) x::1 || a b _ a ;
apply down abababa
echo --

regex a b (->) x::1 \\ a b _ a ;
apply down abababa
echo --

regex a b (->) x::1 // a b _ a ;
apply down abababa
echo --

regex a b (->) x::1 \/ a b _ a ;
apply down abababa
